Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2
EQUIPMENT

Cross references:

For the penalty for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-201. Obstruction of view or driving mechanism - hazardous situation.

No person shall drive a vehicle when it is so loaded or when there are in the front seat such number of persons, exceeding three, as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the driver's control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No person shall knowingly drive a vehicle while any passenger therein is riding in any manner which endangers the safety of such passenger or others.

A person shall not drive a motor vehicle equipped with a video display visible to the driver while the motor vehicle is in motion. This subsection (3) does not prohibit the usage of a computer, data terminal, or safety equipment in a motor vehicle so long as the computer, data terminal, or safety equipment is not used to display visual entertainment, including internet browsing, social media, and e-mail, to the driver while the motor vehicle is in motion.

No vehicle shall be operated upon any highway unless the driver's vision through any required glass equipment is normal and unobstructed.

No passenger in a vehicle shall ride in such position as to create a hazard for such passenger or others, or to interfere with the driver's view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with the driver's control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle; nor shall the driver of a vehicle permit any passenger therein to ride in such manner.

No person shall hang on or otherwise attach himself or herself to the outside, top, hood, or fenders of any vehicle, or to any other portion thereof, other than the specific enclosed portion of such vehicle intended for passengers or while in a sitting position in the cargo area of a vehicle if such area is fully or partially enclosed on all four sides, while the same is in motion; nor shall the operator knowingly permit any person to hang on or otherwise attach himself or herself to the outside, top, hood, or fenders of any vehicle, or any other portion thereof, other than the specific enclosed portion of such vehicle intended for passengers or while in a sitting position in the cargo area of a vehicle if such area is fully or partially enclosed on all four sides, while the same is in motion. This subsection (6) shall not apply to parades, caravans, or exhibitions which are officially authorized or otherwise permitted by law.

The provisions of subsection (6) of this section shall not apply to a vehicle owned by the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or to a vehicle owned by the state of Colorado or any of its political subdivisions, or to a privately owned vehicle when operating in a governmental capacity under contract with or permit from any governmental subdivision or under permit issued by the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado, when in the performance of their duties persons are required to stand or sit on the exterior of the vehicle and said vehicle is equipped with adequate handrails and safeguards.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2238, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2012:

(3) amended, (SB 12-092), ch. 111, p. 387, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-202. Unsafe vehicles - penalty - identification plates.

It is unlawful for any person to drive or move or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person, or which does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with such lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this section and sections 42-4-204 to 42-4-231 and part 3 of this article, or which is equipped in any manner in violation of said sections and part 3 or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under said sections and part 3.

The provisions of this section and sections 42-4-204 to 42-4-231 and part 3 of this article with respect to equipment on vehicles shall not apply to implements of husbandry or farm tractors, except as made applicable in said sections and part 3.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts and accessories on any vehicle, consistent with the provisions of this article.

Upon its approval, the department shall issue an identification plate for each vehicle, motor vehicle, trailer, or item of special mobile machinery, or similar implement of equipment, used in any type of construction business which shall, when said plate is affixed, exempt any such item of equipment, machinery, trailer, or vehicle from all or part of this section and sections 42-4-204 to 42-4-231 and part 3 of this article.

The department is authorized to promulgate written rules and regulations governing the application for, issuance of, and supervision, administration, and revocation of such identification plates and exemption authority and to prescribe the terms and conditions under which said plates may be issued for each item as set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), and the department, in so doing, shall consider the safety of users of the public streets and highways and the type, nature, and use of such items set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) for which exemption is sought.

Each exempt item may be moved on the roads, streets, and highways during daylight hours and at such time as vision is not less than five hundred feet. No cargo or supplies shall be hauled upon such exempt item except cargo and supplies used in normal operation of any such item.

The identification plate shall be of a size and type designated and approved by the department. A fee of one dollar shall be charged and collected by the department for the issuance of each such identification plate. All such fees so collected shall be paid to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to the highway users tax fund for allocation and expenditure as specified in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b), C.R.S.

Each such identification plate shall be issued for a calendar year. Application for such identification plates shall be made by the owner, and such plates shall be issued to the owner of each such item described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4). Whenever the owner transfers, sells, or assigns the owner's interest therein, the exemption of such item shall expire and the owner shall remove the identification plate therefrom and forward the same to the department.

An owner shall report a lost or damaged identification plate to the department, and, upon application to and approval by the department, the department shall issue a replacement plate upon payment to it of a fee of fifty cents.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this subsection (4), the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2239, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(4)(g) added, p. 1357, § 111, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(4)(d) amended, p. 149, § 25, effective April 5.

L. 2010:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1492, § 15, effective October 1.

42-4-203. Unsafe vehicles - spot inspections.

Uniformed police officers, at any time upon reasonable cause, may require the driver of a vehicle to stop and submit such vehicle and its equipment to an inspection and such test with reference thereto as may be appropriate. The fact that a vehicle is an older model vehicle shall not alone constitute reasonable cause. In the event such vehicle is found to be in an unsafe condition or the required equipment is not present or is not in proper repair and adjustment, the officer may give a written notice and issue a summons to the driver. Said notice shall require that such vehicle be placed in safe condition and properly equipped or that its equipment be placed in proper repair and adjustment, the particulars of which shall be specified on said notice.

In the event any such vehicle is, in the reasonable judgment of such police officer, in such condition that further operation would be hazardous, the officer may require, in addition to the instructions set forth in subsection (1) of this section, that the vehicle be moved at the operator's expense and not operated under its own power or that it be driven to the nearest garage or other place of safety.

Every owner or driver upon receiving the notice and summons issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this section or mailed pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section shall comply therewith and shall secure a certification upon such notice by a law enforcement officer that such vehicle is in safe condition and its equipment has been placed in proper repair and adjustment and otherwise made to conform to the requirements of this article. Said certification shall be returned to the owner or driver for presentation in court as provided for in subsection (4) of this section.

Except as provided for in subparagraph (II) or subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a), any owner receiving written notice and a summons pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.
(4) (a) (I) Except as provided for in subparagraph (II) or subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a), any owner receiving written notice and a summons pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.

If the owner repairs the unsafe condition or installs or adjusts the required equipment within thirty days after issuance of the notice and summons and presents the certification required in subsection (3) of this section to the court of competent jurisdiction, the owner shall be punished by a fine of five dollars.

If the owner submits to the court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the issuance of the summons proof that the owner has disposed of the vehicle for junk parts or immobilized the vehicle and also submits to the court the registration and license plates for the vehicle, the owner shall be punished by a fine of five dollars. If the owner wishes to relicense the vehicle in the future, the owner must obtain the certification required in subsection (3) of this section.

Except as provided for in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (b), any nonowner driver receiving written notice and a summons pursuant to this section is guilty of a misdemeanor traffic offense and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars, payable within thirty days after conviction.

If the driver submits to the court of competent jurisdiction within thirty days after the issuance of the summons proof that the driver was not the owner of the car at the time the summons was issued and that the driver mailed, within five days of issuance thereof, a copy of the notice and summons by certified mail to the owner of the vehicle at the address on the registration, the driver shall be punished by a fine of five dollars.

Upon a showing of good cause that the required repairs or adjustments cannot be made within thirty days after issuance of the notice and summons, the court of competent jurisdiction may extend the period of time for installation or adjustment of required equipment as may appear justified.

The owner may, in lieu of appearance, submit to the court of competent jurisdiction, within thirty days after the issuance of the notice and summons, the certification specified in subsection (3) of this section and the fine of five dollars.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2240, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-306.1 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-203 was relocated to § 42-4-204.

42-4-204. When lighted lamps are required.

Every vehicle upon a highway within this state, between sunset and sunrise and at any other time when, due to insufficient light or unfavorable atmospheric conditions, persons and vehicles on the highway are not clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand feet ahead, shall display lighted lamps and illuminating devices as required by this article for different classes of vehicles, subject to exceptions with respect to parked vehicles.

Whenever requirement is declared by this article as to distance from which certain lamps and devices shall render objects visible or within which such lamps or devices shall be visible, said provisions shall apply during the times stated in subsection (1) of this section in respect to a vehicle without load when upon a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions, unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

Whenever requirement is declared by this article as to the mounted height of lamps or devices, it shall mean from the center of such lamp or device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when such vehicle is without a load.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2242, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-203 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-204 was relocated to § 42-4-205.

42-4-205. Head lamps on motor vehicles.

Every motor vehicle other than a motorcycle shall be equipped with at least two head lamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which head lamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in sections 42-4-202 and 42-4-204 to 42-4-231 and part 3 of this article where applicable.

Every motorcycle shall be equipped with at least one and not more than two head lamps that shall comply with the requirements and limitations of sections 42-4-202 and 42-4-204 to 42-4-231 and part 3 of this article where applicable.

Every head lamp upon every motor vehicle, including every motorcycle, shall be located at a height measured from the center of the head lamp of not more than fifty-four inches nor less than twenty-four inches, to be measured as set forth in section 42-4-204 (3).

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2242, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(1) to (3) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1272, § 38, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-204 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-205 was relocated to § 42-4-206.

42-4-206. Tail lamps and reflectors.

To be operated on a road, every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, and pole trailer and any other vehicle that is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles must be equipped with at least one tail lamp mounted on the rear, which, when lighted as required in section 42-4-204, emits a red light plainly visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear; except that, in the case of a train of vehicles, only the tail lamp on the rear-most vehicle need actually be seen from the distance specified, except as provided in section 42-12-204. Furthermore, every vehicle registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1958, must be equipped with at least two tail lamps mounted on the rear, on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, which, when lighted as required in section 42-4-204, comply with this section.

Every tail lamp upon every vehicle shall be located at a height of not more than seventy-two inches nor less than twenty inches, to be measured as set forth in section 42-4-204 (3).

Either a tail lamp or a separate lamp shall be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate and render it clearly legible from a distance of fifty feet to the rear. Any tail lamp, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, shall be so wired as to be lighted whenever the head lamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted.

To be operated on a road, every motor vehicle must carry on the rear, either as part of a tail lamp or separately, one red reflector meeting the requirements of this section; except that vehicles of the type mentioned in section 42-4-207 must be equipped with reflectors as required by law unless otherwise provided in section 42-12-204.

Every new motor vehicle sold and operated on and after January 1, 1958, upon a highway shall carry on the rear, whether as a part of the tail lamps or separately, two red reflectors; except that every motorcycle shall carry at least one reflector meeting the requirements of this section, and vehicles of the type mentioned in section 42-4-207 shall be equipped with reflectors as required in those sections applicable thereto.

Every reflector shall be mounted on the vehicle at a height of not less than twenty inches nor more than sixty inches, measured as set forth in section 42-4-204 (3) and shall be of such size and characteristics and so mounted as to be visible at night from all distances within three hundred fifty feet to one hundred feet from such vehicle when directly in front of lawful upper beams and head lamps; except that visibility from a greater distance is required by law of reflectors on certain types of vehicles.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2243, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 440, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 97:

(3) amended, p. 393, § 3, effective August 6.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2323, § 8, effective August 5; (5) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1272, § 39, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 243, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-205 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-206 was relocated to § 42-4-207.

42-4-207. Clearance and identification.

Every vehicle designed or used for the transportation of property or for the transportation of persons shall display lighted lamps at the times mentioned in section 42-4-204 when and as required in this section.

Clearance lamps.

Every motor vehicle or motor-drawn vehicle having a width at any part in excess of eighty inches shall be equipped with four clearance lamps located as follows:

Two on the front and one at each side, displaying an amber light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the front of the vehicle;

Two on the rear and one at each side, displaying a red light visible only to the rear and visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle, which said rear clearance lamps shall be in addition to the rear red lamp required in section 42-4-206.

All clearance lamps required shall be placed on the extreme sides and located on the highest stationary support; except that, when three or more identification lamps are mounted on the rear of a vehicle on the vertical center line and at the extreme height of the vehicle, rear clearance lamps may be mounted at optional height.

Any trailer, when operated in conjunction with a vehicle which is properly equipped with front clearance lamps as provided in this section, may be, but is not required to be, equipped with front clearance lamps if the towing vehicle is of equal or greater width than the towed vehicle.

All clearance lamps required in this section shall be of a type approved by the department.

Side marker lamps.

Every motor vehicle or motor-drawn vehicle or combination of such vehicles which exceeds thirty feet in overall length shall be equipped with four side marker lamps located as follows:

One on each side near the front displaying an amber light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the side of the vehicle on which it is located;

One on each side near the rear displaying a red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the side of the vehicle on which it is located; but the rear marker light shall not be so placed as to be visible from the front of the vehicle.

Each side marker lamp required shall be located not less than fifteen inches above the level on which the vehicle stands.

If the clearance lamps required by this section are of such a design as to display lights visible from a distance of five hundred feet at right angles to the sides of the vehicles, they shall be deemed to meet the requirements as to marker lamps in this subsection (3).

All marker lamps required in this section shall be of a type approved by the department.

Clearance reflectors.

Every motor vehicle having a width at any part in excess of eighty inches shall be equipped with clearance reflectors located as follows:

Two red reflectors on the rear and one at each side, located not more than one inch from the extreme outside edges of the vehicle;

All such reflectors shall be located not more than sixty inches nor less than fifteen inches above the level on which the vehicle stands.

One or both of the required rear red reflectors may be incorporated within the tail lamp or tail lamps if any such tail lamps meet the location limits specified for reflectors.

All such clearance reflectors shall be of a type approved by the department.

Side marker reflectors.

Every motor vehicle or motor-drawn vehicle or combination of vehicles which exceeds thirty feet in overall length shall be equipped with four side marker reflectors located as follows:

One amber reflector on each side near the front;

One red reflector on each side near the rear.

Each side marker reflector shall be located not more than sixty inches nor less than fifteen inches above the level on which the vehicle stands.

All such side marker reflectors shall be of a type approved by the department.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede any federal motor vehicle safety standard established pursuant to the "National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966", Public Law 89-563, as amended.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2292, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-206 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-207 was relocated to § 42-4-208.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to the "National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1966", see 49 U.S.C. sec. 30101 et seq.

42-4-208. Stop lamps and turn signals.

Every motor vehicle or motor-drawn vehicle shall be equipped with a stop light in good working order at all times and shall meet the requirements of section 42-4-215 (1).

No person shall sell or offer for sale or operate on the highways any motor vehicle registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1958, unless it is equipped with at least two stop lamps meeting the requirements of section 42-4-215 (1); except that a motorcycle manufactured or assembled after said date shall be equipped with at least one stop lamp meeting the requirements of section 42-4-215 (1).

No person shall sell or offer for sale or operate on the highways any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1958, and no person shall operate any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer on the highways when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of such motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four inches, unless it is equipped with electrical turn signals meeting the requirements of section 42-4-215 (2). This subsection (3) shall not apply to any motorcycle or low-power scooter.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2246, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1273, § 40, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-207 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-208 was relocated to § 42-4-209.

42-4-209. Lamp or flag on projecting load.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four feet or more beyond the bed or body of such vehicle, there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load, at the time specified in section 42-4-204, a red light or lantern plainly visible from a distance of at least five hundred feet to the sides and rear. The red light or lantern required under this section shall be in addition to the red rear light required upon every vehicle. At any other time, there shall be displayed at the extreme rear end of such load a red flag or cloth not less than twelve inches square and so hung that the entire area is visible to the driver of a vehicle approaching from the rear. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2246, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-208 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-209 was relocated to § 42-4-210.

42-4-210. Lamps on parked vehicles.

Whenever a vehicle is lawfully parked upon a highway during the hours between sunset and sunrise and in the event there is sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of one thousand feet upon such highway, no lights need be displayed upon such parked vehicle.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto, whether attended or unattended, during the hours between sunset and sunrise and there is not sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of one thousand feet upon such highway, such vehicle so parked or stopped shall be equipped with one or more operating lamps meeting the following requirements: At least one lamp shall display a white or amber light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the front of the vehicle, and the same lamp or at least one other lamp shall display a red light visible from a distance of five hundred feet to the rear of the vehicle, and the location of said lamp or lamps shall always be such that at least one lamp or combination of lamps meeting the requirements of this section is installed as near as practicable to the side of the vehicle that is closer to passing traffic. This subsection (2) shall not apply to a low-power scooter.

Any lighted head lamps upon a parked vehicle shall be depressed or dimmed.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

This section shall not apply to low-speed electric vehicles.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2246, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(5) added, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2323, § 9, effective August 5; (2) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1273, § 41, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-209 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-210 was relocated to § 42-4-211.

42-4-211. Lamps on farm equipment and other vehicles and equipment.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled farm equipment unit or implement of husbandry not equipped with an electric lighting system shall, at all times mentioned in section 42-4-204, be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the front of such vehicle and shall also be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a red light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear of such vehicle.

Every self-propelled unit of farm equipment not equipped with an electric lighting system shall, at all times mentioned in section 42-4-204, in addition to the lamps required in subsection (1) of this section, be equipped with two red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred feet to one hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps.

Every combination of farm tractor and towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry not equipped with an electric lighting system shall, at all times mentioned in section 42-4-204, be equipped with the following lamps:

At least one lamp mounted to indicate as nearly as practicable to the extreme left projection of said combination and displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the front of said combination;

Two lamps each displaying a red light visible when lighted from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear of said combination or, as an alternative, at least one lamp displaying a red light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear thereof and two red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred feet to one hundred feet to the rear thereof when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps.

Every farm tractor and every self-propelled unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry equipped with an electric lighting system shall, at all times mentioned in section 42-4-204, be equipped with two single-beam head lamps meeting the requirements of section 42-4-216 or 42-4-218, respectively, and at least one red lamp visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear; but every such self-propelled unit of farm equipment other than a farm tractor shall have two such red lamps or, as an alternative, one such red lamp and two red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred feet to one hundred feet when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps.

Every combination of farm tractor and towed farm equipment or towed implement of husbandry equipped with an electric lighting system shall, at all times mentioned in section 42-4-204, be equipped with lamps as follows:

The farm tractor element of every such combination shall be equipped as required in subsection (4) of this section.

The towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry element of such combination shall be equipped with two red lamps visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear or, as an alternative, two red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful upper beams of head lamps.

Said combinations shall also be equipped with a lamp displaying a white or amber light, or any shade of color between white and amber, visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the front and a lamp displaying a red light visible when lighted from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear.

The lamps and reflectors required in this section shall be so positioned as to show from front and rear as nearly as practicable the extreme projection of the vehicle carrying them on the side of the roadway used in passing such vehicle. If a farm tractor or a unit of farm equipment, whether self-propelled or towed, is equipped with two or more lamps or reflectors visible from the front or two or more lamps or reflectors visible from the rear, such lamps or reflectors shall be so positioned that the extreme projections, both to the right and to the left of said vehicle, shall be indicated as nearly as practicable.

Every vehicle, including animal-drawn vehicles and vehicles referred to in section 42-4-202 (2), not specifically required by the provisions of this article to be equipped with lamps or other lighting devices shall at all times specified in section 42-4-204 be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the front of said vehicle and shall also be equipped with two lamps displaying red lights visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear of said vehicle or, as an alternative, one lamp displaying a red light visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet to the rear and two red reflectors visible for distances of one hundred feet to six hundred feet to the rear when illuminated by the upper beams of head lamps.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2247, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1273, § 42, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-210 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-211 was relocated to § 42-4-212.

42-4-212. Spot lamps and auxiliary lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two spot lamps, and every lighted spot lamp shall be so aimed and used upon approaching another vehicle that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will be directed to the left of the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle nor more than one hundred feet ahead of the vehicle.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two fog lamps mounted on the front at a height of not less than twelve inches nor more than thirty inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands and so aimed that, when the vehicle is not loaded, none of the high-intensity portion of the light to the left of the center of the vehicle shall at a distance of twenty-five feet ahead project higher than a level of four inches below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes. Lighted fog lamps meeting the requirements of this subsection (2) may be used with lower head-lamp beams as specified in section 42-4-216 (1)(b).

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two auxiliary passing lamps mounted on the front at a height of not less than twenty inches nor more than forty-two inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 42-4-216 shall apply to any combination of head lamps and auxiliary passing lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not more than two auxiliary driving lamps mounted on the front at a height of not less than sixteen inches nor more than forty-two inches above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 42-4-216 shall apply to any combination of head lamps and auxiliary driving lamps.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2249, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-211 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-212 was relocated to § 42-4-213.

42-4-213. Audible and visual signals on emergency vehicles.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or in section 42-4-222 in the case of volunteer fire vehicles and volunteer ambulances, every authorized emergency vehicle shall, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this article, be equipped as a minimum with a siren and a horn. Such devices shall be capable of emitting a sound audible under normal conditions from a distance of not less than five hundred feet.

Every authorized emergency vehicle, except those used as undercover vehicles by governmental agencies, shall, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this article, be equipped with at least one signal lamp mounted as high as practicable, which shall be capable of displaying a flashing, oscillating, or rotating red light to the front and to the rear having sufficient intensity to be visible at five hundred feet in normal sunlight. In addition to the required red light, flashing, oscillating, or rotating signal lights may be used which emit blue, white, or blue in combination with white.

A police vehicle, when used as an authorized emergency vehicle, may but need not be equipped with the red lights specified in this section.

Any authorized emergency vehicle, including those authorized by section 42-4-222, may be equipped with green flashing lights, mounted at sufficient height and having sufficient intensity to be visible at five hundred feet in all directions in normal daylight. Such lights may only be used at the single designated command post at any emergency location or incident and only when such command post is stationary. The single command post shall be designated by the on-scene incident commander in accordance with local or state government emergency plans. Any other use of a green light by a vehicle shall constitute a violation of this section.

The use of either the audible or the visual signal equipment described in this section shall impose upon drivers of other vehicles the obligation to yield right-of-way and stop as prescribed in section 42-4-705.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2249, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-212 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-213 was relocated to § 42-4-215.